Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4074.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1a. (1) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, a conservation officer shall wear a body-worn camera while exercising the conservation officer's duties as a conservation officer. (2) The disclosure of an audio or video recording recorded by a conservation officer's body-worn camera under this section is subject to the law enforcement body-worn camera privacy act, 2017 PA 85, MCL 780.311 to 780.318. (3) As used in this section, "body-worn camera" means that term as defined in section 2 of the law enforcement body-worn camera privacy act, 2017 PA 85, MCL 780.312.